District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1105

Applicability of chapter.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 28, 1933, 47 Stat. 1348, ch. 130, § 6
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 2002(i), 48 DCR 6981

Cross References

Property exempt from taxation, assessments, see § 47-1011.
Real property assessments and taxes, assessments due and payable, see § 47-832.
Street repairs, sidewalk, curbing, sewer system, and water supply system improvements, assessments upon adjoining properties, see § 9-401.01 et seq.
Water main and service sewer construction, assessments, see § 34-2405.01 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1105.
1973 Ed., § 47-905.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 2(i) of Real Property Tax Assessment Transition Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-23, September 6, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 9093).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2(i) of Real Property Tax Assessment Transition Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-44, April 18, 2001, 48 DCR 3844).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2(i) of Real Property Tax Assessment Transition Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-116, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7659).

Editor's Notes

Office of Assessor abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-413.